Connecticut, session 2026, HB05450.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) The Brooklyn Fire District,
established pursuant to number 41 of the special acts of 1899, is hereby
dissolved. The funds and tangible property held by said fire district
shall be transferred to the town of Brooklyn for the benefit of said town.
Sec. 2. Number 41 of the special acts of 1899 is repealed. (Effective
October 1, 2026)
Governor's Action:
Approved May 26, 2026